Utah statutes.
63G-6a-905.   Quote, bid, offer, or contract prohibited by person with outstanding tax lien -- Exceptions -- Rejection of quote, bid, or offer.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person with an outstanding tax lien in the state may not:

(a)  submit a quote, bid, or offer to a procurement unit; or

(b)  contract to provide a procurement item to a procurement unit.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to the extent that a procurement officer determines it is in the public interest to grant an exception to the requirements of Subsection (1) for a particular quote, bid, offer, or contract specified by the procurement officer.

(3)  A procurement unit may reject a quote, bid, or offer submitted in violation of Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

